Vermont, session 2025-2026, S91.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. chapter 137 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 137. RESIDENTIAL RENTAL AGREEMENTS
* * *
§ 4454. ATTEMPT TO CIRCUMVENT REQUIRED RENTAL
AGREEMENT TERMS
(a) A landlord shall ensure that a rental agreement with a duration of 12
months or longer is in writing and includes:
(1) identification of the parties involved, including contact information
for the owner and any party responsible for managing the property on the
owner’s behalf;
(2) a description of the property subject to the agreement;
(3) the duration of the agreement, including whether the agreement is
periodic or for a fixed term, with clearly specified start and end dates;
(4) the financial obligations of the tenant, including the amount of rent,
the due date, and the method of payment;
(5) whether there are penalties for late payment of rent, including the
date the penalty becomes effective and the calculation of the penalty amount;
(6) the amount of any security deposit and the conditions under which
part or all of the security deposit may be withheld, in compliance with section
4461 of this title;
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 3 of 31
(7) a description of the responsibility of the parties for maintenance and
repair of the property;
(8) a description of the responsibilities of the parties for the provision of,
and payment for, utilities for the rental unit;
(9) a statement of the rights and responsibilities of the parties to the
agreement;
(10) an accurate statement of the protections against retaliation in
section 4465 of this title;
(11) a statement that a tenant may not be evicted without cause; and
(12) any other disclosure required by law.
(b) No rental agreement shall contain any provision that attempts to
circumvent or circumvents obligations and remedies established by this chapter
and any such provision shall be unenforceable and void.
Subchapter 2. Residential Rental Agreements
* * *
§ 4456a. RESIDENTIAL RENTAL APPLICATION FEES; PROHIBITED
ACTS
(a) A landlord or a landlord’s agent shall not:
(1) charge an application fee to any individual in order to apply to enter
into a rental agreement for a residential dwelling unit; or
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 4 of 31
(2) request the Social Security number of an individual or a member of
an individual’s household in order to apply to enter into a rental agreement for
a residential dwelling unit or to conduct a criminal background or credit check.
(b) As used in this section, an “application fee” includes any fee or charge
associated with a credit check, background check, or third-party processing
payment or any other costs associated with a rental agreement application.
(c) If required during the application process, a landlord or a landlord’s
agent shall accept an original or a copy of any form of government-issued
identification.
(d) This section shall not be construed to prohibit a person from charging a
fee to a person in order to apply to rent commercial or nonresidential property.
(e) A person who violates this section commits an unfair practice in
commerce in violation of section 2453 of this title.
* * *
§ 4467. TERMINATION OF TENANCY; NOTICE
(a) Termination for nonpayment of rent. The landlord may terminate a
tenancy for nonpayment of rent by providing actual notice to the tenant of the
date on which the tenancy will terminate, which shall be at least 14 days after
the date of the actual notice. The rental agreement shall not terminate if the
tenant pays or tenders rent due through the end of the rental period in which
payment is made or tendered. Acceptance of partial payment of rent shall not
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 5 of 31
constitute a waiver of the landlord’s remedies for nonpayment of rent or an
accord and satisfaction for nonpayment of rent.
(b) Termination for breach of rental agreement.
(1) The landlord may terminate a tenancy for failure of the tenant to
comply with a material term of the rental agreement or with obligations
imposed under this chapter by actual notice given to the tenant at least 30 days
prior to the termination date specified in the notice.
(2) When termination is based on criminal activity, illegal drug activity,
or acts of violence, any of which threaten the health or safety of other
residents, the landlord may terminate the tenancy by providing actual notice to
the tenant of the date on which the tenancy will terminate, which shall be at
least 14 days from the date of the actual notice.
(c) Termination for no cause. In the absence of a written rental agreement,
subject to subdivision (3) of this subsection, the landlord may terminate a
tenancy for no cause as follows:
(1) If rent is payable on a monthly basis, by providing actual notice to
the tenant of the date on which the tenancy will terminate, which shall be:
(A) for tenants who have resided continuously in the same premises
for two years or less, at least 60 days after the date of the actual notice; or
(B) for tenants who have resided continuously in the same premises
for more than two years, at least 90 days after the date of the actual notice.
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 6 of 31
(2) If rent is payable on a weekly basis, by providing actual notice to the
tenant of the date on which the tenancy will terminate, which shall be at least
21 days after the date of the actual notice.
(3) This subsection shall apply only in the following circumstances:
(A) the rental unit is one of a two-unit or three-unit owner-occupied
building; or
(B) the rental unit requires renovations that exceed 50 percent of the
rental unit’s value to become or remain habitable, provided that the tenant shall
have the right of first refusal to reoccupy the unit at market rate following
renovations and the tenant had been provided with adequate relocation costs
for the duration of the renovations.
(d) Termination of rental agreement when property is sold. In the absence
of a written rental agreement, a landlord who has contracted to sell the building
may terminate a tenancy by providing actual notice to the tenant of the date on
which the tenancy will terminate, which shall be at least 30 days three months
after the date of the actual notice.
(e) Termination for no cause under terms of written rental agreement.
Subject to subdivision (2) of this subsection:
(1) If there is a written rental agreement, the notice to terminate for no
cause shall be at least 30 days before the end or expiration of the stated term of
the rental agreement if the tenancy has continued for two years or less. The
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 7 of 31
notice to terminate for no cause shall be at least 60 days before the end or
expiration of the term of the rental agreement if the tenancy has continued for
more than two years. If there is a written week-to-week rental agreement, the
notice to terminate for no cause shall be at least seven days; however, a notice
to terminate for nonpayment of rent shall be as provided in subsection (a) of
this section.
(2) This subsection shall apply only in the following circumstances:
(A) the rental unit is one of a two-unit or three-unit owner-occupied
building; or
(B) the rental unit requires renovations that exceed 50 percent of the
rental unit’s value to become or remain habitable, provided that the tenant shall
have the right of first refusal to reoccupy the unit at market rate following
renovations and the tenant had been provided with adequate relocation costs
for the duration of the renovations.
(f) Termination date for no cause prohibited. In all cases, the termination
date shall be specifically stated in the notice.
(1)(A) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a landlord shall not
terminate a tenancy without cause.
(B) For purposes of this subsection (f), the expiration of a rental
agreement shall not constitute cause for a landlord to terminate a tenancy.
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 8 of 31
(2) A landlord may terminate a tenancy for no cause, if allowed by the
rental agreement, within the first three months of a new tenancy.
(3)(A) A landlord may terminate a tenancy for no cause if the landlord
or a member of the landlord’s immediate family has a good faith intention to
occupy the premises.
(B) A landlord shall provide the tenant with actual notice of the date
on which the tenancy will terminate, which shall be at least six months after
the date of the actual notice.
(C) As used in this subdivision (3), “immediate family” means:
(i) an adult person related by blood, adoption, marriage, or as
defined or described in similar law in another jurisdiction;
(ii) an unmarried parent of a joint child;
(iii) a child, grandchild, foster child, ward, or guardian; or
(iv) a child, grandchild, foster child, ward, or guardian of any
person listed in subdivision (i) or (ii) of this subdivision (f)(3)(C).
(4) A landlord may terminate a tenancy for no cause pursuant to
subsection (c) or (e) of this section.
(5) A landlord may terminate a tenancy of shared occupancy for no
cause pursuant to subsection (h) of this section.
(6) A landlord may terminate a tenancy in order to comply with a State
law or municipal government order that requires the tenant to leave.
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 9 of 31
(g) Conversion to condominium. If the building is being converted to
condominiums, notice shall be given in accordance with 27 V.S.A. chapter 15,
subchapter 2.
(h) Termination of shared occupancy. A rental arrangement whereby a
person rents to another individual one or more rooms in his or her the person’s
personal residence that includes the shared use of any of the common living
spaces, such as the living room, kitchen, or bathroom, may be terminated by
either party by providing actual notice to the other of the date the rental
agreement shall terminate, which shall be at least 15 days after the date of
actual notice if the rent is payable monthly and at least seven days after the
date of actual notice if the rent is payable weekly.
(i) Multiple Termination date; multiple notices.
(1) A landlord shall specifically state a termination date in a notice of
termination.
(2) All actual notices that are in compliance with this section shall not
invalidate any other actual notice and shall be a valid basis for commencing
and maintaining an action for possession pursuant to this chapter, 10 V.S.A.
chapter 153, 11 V.S.A. chapter 14, or 12 V.S.A. chapter 169, notwithstanding
that the notices may be based on different or unrelated grounds, dates of
termination, or that the notices are sent at different times prior to or during an
ejectment action. A landlord may maintain an ejectment action and rely on as
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 10 of 31
many grounds for ejectment as are allowed by law at any time during the
eviction process.
(j) Payment after termination; effect.
(1) A landlord’s acceptance of full or partial rent payment by or on
behalf of a tenant after the termination of the tenancy for reasons other than
nonpayment of rent or at any time during the ejectment action shall not result
in the dismissal of an ejectment action or constitute a waiver of the landlord’s
remedies to proceed with an eviction action based on any of the following:
(A) the tenant’s breach of the terms of a rental agreement pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section;
(B) the tenant’s breach of the tenant’s obligations pursuant to
subsections 4456(a), (b), and (c) of this title; or
(C) for no cause pursuant to subsections (c), (d), (e), and (h) of this
section.
(2) This subsection shall apply to 10 V.S.A. chapter 153, 11 V.S.A.
chapter 14, and 12 V.S.A. chapter 169.
(k) Commencement of ejectment action. A notice to terminate a tenancy
shall be insufficient to support a judgment of eviction unless the proceeding is
commenced not later than 60 days from the termination date set forth in the
notice.
* * *
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 11 of 31
§ 4468b. MAXIMUM INCREASE IN RENT
(a) A landlord shall not increase rent during any 12-month period in an
amount greater than one percent above the U.S. Consumer Price Index for all
Urban Consumers, Housing Component, published by the U.S. Bureau of
Labor Statistics in the periodical “Monthly Labor Review and Handbook of
Labor Statistics” as established annually by the Department of Housing and
Community Development, or five percent, whichever is less.
(b) A landlord shall specify in a notice of increase of rent:
(1) the amount of the rent increase;
(2) the amount of the new rent; and
(3) the date on which the increase becomes effective.
(c) A landlord shall notify a tenant of an increase in rent not less than 90
days prior to the date the increase takes effect.
* * *
Subchapter 5. Tenant Rights to Purchase Property
§ 4476. TENANT RIGHTS TO PURCHASE PROPERTY
(a) Notice.
(1) An owner of a residential rental property that contains three or more
dwelling units shall give to each tenant and to the Commissioner of Housing
and Community Development notice by certified mail, return receipt
requested, of the owner’s intention to sell the property.
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 12 of 31
(2) If a tenant refuses the notice, or it is otherwise undeliverable, the
owner shall send the notice by first-class mail to the tenant’s last known
mailing address.
(3) The notice shall state the following:
(A) the owner intends to sell the property;
(B) the price, terms, and conditions under which the owner offers the
property for sale;
(C) a list of the affected tenants;
(D) the status of compliance with applicable statutes, rules, and
permits, to the owner’s best knowledge, and the reasons for any
noncompliance; and
(E) that for 45 days following the notice, the owner shall not make a
final unconditional acceptance of an offer to purchase the property and that if
within the 45 days the owner receives notice pursuant to subsection (c) of this
section that a majority of the tenants intend to consider purchase of the
property, the owner shall not make a final unconditional acceptance of an offer
to purchase the property for an additional 120 days, starting from the 46th day
following notice, except one from a group representing a majority of the
tenants or from a nonprofit corporation approved by a majority of the tenants.
(b) Resident intent to negotiate; timetable.
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 13 of 31
(1) The tenants shall have 45 days following notice under subsection (a)
of this section to determine whether they intend to consider purchase of the
property through a group representing a majority of the tenants or a nonprofit
corporation approved by a majority of the tenants.
(2) A majority of the tenants is determined by one vote per leasehold,
and no tenant shall have more than three votes or 30 percent of the aggregate
property vote, whichever is less.
(3) During this 45-day period, the owner shall not accept a final
unconditional offer to purchase the property.
(c) Response to notice; required action.
(1) If the owner does not receive notice from the tenants during the 45-
day period, or if the tenants notify the owner that they do not intend to consider
purchase of the property, the owner has no further restrictions regarding sale of
the building pursuant to this section.
(2) If, during the 45-day period, the owner receives notice in writing that
a majority of the tenants intend to consider purchase of the property, then the
owner shall:
(A) not accept a final unconditional offer to purchase from a party
other than leaseholders for 120 days following the 45-day period, a total of 165
days following the notice from the leaseholders;
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 14 of 31
(B) negotiate in good faith with the group representing a majority of
the tenants or a nonprofit corporation approved by a majority of the tenants
concerning purchase of the property;
(C) consider any offer to purchase from a group representing a
majority of the tenants or from a nonprofit corporation approved by a majority
of the tenants; and
(D) accept an offer from the tenants or nonprofit corporation if the
offer:
(i) equals or exceeds the appraised value of the property; or
(ii) is on substantially equivalent terms and conditions as the best
reasonable offer from another third party.
(d) Penalties.
(1) An owner who sells a property without complying with this section:
(A) is liable to the tenants in the aggregate amount of $10,000.00 or
50 percent of the gain realized by the owner from the sale, whichever is
greater; and
(B) commits an unfair practice in trade and commerce in violation of
section 2453 of this title.
(2) The Department of Housing and Community Development may:
(A) impose an administrative penalty of not more than $5,000.00 per
violation;
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 15 of 31
(B) bring a civil action for damages or injunctive relief, or both; and
(C) refer a violation to the Attorney General or State’s Attorney for
enforcement pursuant to subdivision (1)(B) of this subsection (d).
(e) Exceptions. The provisions of this section do not apply when the sale,
transfer, or conveyance of the property occurs through one or more of the
following:
(1) through a foreclosure sale;
(2) to a member of the owner’s family or to a trust for the sole benefit of
members of the owner’s family;
(3) among the partners who own the property;
(4) incidental to financing the building;
(5) between joint tenants or tenants in common;
(6) pursuant to eminent domain; or
(7) pursuant to a municipal tax sale.
(f) Requirement for new notice of intent to sell.
(1) Subject to subdivision (2) of this subsection, a notice of intent to sell
issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section is valid:
(A) for a period of one year from the expiration of the 45-day period
following the date of the notice; or
(B) if the owner has entered into a binding purchase and sale
agreement with a group representing a majority of the tenants or a nonprofit
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 16 of 31
corporation approved by a majority of the tenants within one year from the
expiration of the 45-day period following the date of the notice until the
completion of the sale of the property under the agreement or the expiration of
the agreement, whichever is sooner.
(2) During the period in which a notice of intent to sell is valid, an
owner shall provide a new notice of intent to sell, consistent with the
requirements of subsection (a) of this section, prior to making an offer to sell
the property or accepting an offer to purchase the property that is either more
than five percent below the price for which the property was initially offered
for sale or less than five percent above the final written offer from a group
representing a majority of the tenants or a nonprofit corporation approved by a
majority of the tenants.
(g) Good faith. A group representing a majority of the tenants or a
nonprofit corporation approved by a majority of the tenants shall negotiate in
good faith with the owner for purchase of the property.
Sec. 2. 3 V.S.A. § 2478 is added to read:
§ 2478. STATE RENTAL HOUSING REGISTRY; HOUSING DATA
(a) The Department of Housing and Community Development, in
coordination with the Division of Fire Safety, the Department of Health, the
Enhanced 911 Board, and the Department of Taxes, shall create and maintain a
publicly accessible registry of the rental housing in this State that includes a
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 17 of 31
“dwelling unit” as defined in 9 V.S.A. § 4451 and a “short-term rental” as
defined in 18 V.S.A. § 4301.
(b) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall require
for each unit that is registered the following data:
(1) the name of the owner or landlord and property manager, if
applicable;
(2) phone number, email, and mailing address of the landlord and
property manager, if applicable;
(3) location of the unit and unit number or letter;
(4) year built;
(5) type of rental unit;
(6) number of units in the building;
(7) school property account number;
(8) accessibility of the unit;
(9) number of bedrooms and bathrooms;
(10) for owners of short-term rentals, the number of whole-unit or
partial-unit short-term rentals within the building, or in the case of multiple
buildings on a parcel of land, on the entire lot; and
(11) any other information the Department deems appropriate.
(c) Upon request of the Department of Housing and Community
Development, and at least annually, a municipal, district, or other local
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 18 of 31
government entity that operates a rental housing health and safety program that
requires registration of a rental housing unit and a fee for inclusion on the
registry shall provide to the Department the data for each unit that is required
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
Sec. 3. 3 V.S.A. § 2479 is added to read:
§ 2479. RENTAL HOUSING REGISTRATION
(a) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, an owner of long-
term rental housing that is subject to 9 V.S.A. chapter 137 shall:
(1) file with the Department of Taxes a landlord certificate; and
(2) within 30 days after filing the certificate, register with and pay to the
Department of Housing and Community Development an annual registration
fee of $35.00 per rental unit, unless the owner has within the preceding
12 months:
(A) registered the unit pursuant to subsection (b) of this section; or
(B) registered the unit with a municipal, district, or other local
government entity that operates a rental housing health and safety program.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, an owner of a
short-term rental, as defined in 18 V.S.A. § 4301, shall, annually, within
30 days after renting a unit, register with and pay to the Department of
Housing and Community Development an annual registration fee of $35.00 per
rental unit, unless the owner has within the preceding 12 months:
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 19 of 31
(1) registered the unit pursuant to subsection (a) of this section; or
(2) registered the unit with a municipal, district, or other local
government entity that operates a rental housing health and safety program.
(c)(1) An owner of a mobile home lot within a mobile home park who has
registered the lot with the Department of Housing and Community
Development and who does not own a mobile home on the lot is exempt from
registering the lot pursuant to this section.
(2) An owner of a mobile home lot within a mobile home park who has
registered the lot with the Department and who owns a mobile home on the lot
that is available for rent or rented shall register the property with the
Department and pay a fee equal to the fee required by subdivision (a)(2) of this
section less any fee paid within the previous 12 months pursuant to 10 V.S.A.
§ 6254(c).
(3) An owner of a mobile home who rents the mobile home, whether
located in a mobile home park, shall register pursuant to this section.
(d) An owner of rental housing who fails to register pursuant to this section
shall pay a late registration fee of $150.00 and may be subject to administrative
penalties not to exceed $5,000.00 for each violation.
Sec. 4. 3 V.S.A. § 2480 is added to read:
§ 2480. TENANT’S RIGHTS ADVOCATE
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 20 of 31
(a) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall
contract with a nonprofit organization with expertise in tenant’s rights to
establish the Office of Tenant’s Rights Advocate.
(b) The Office of Tenant’s Rights Advocate shall have the following
functions and duties:
(1) educate tenants and landlords about their rights and responsibilities
and rental housing code requirements;
(2) provide information, referrals, and assistance to tenants seeking help
with issues arising from an existing or potential landlord-tenant relationship;
(3) accept referrals from other organizations to assist individuals with
rental housing needs;
(4) mediate issues on behalf of and with the authorization of an
individual tenant;
(5) identify, investigate, and resolve complaints on behalf of individual
tenants and assist them with filing and pursuit of complaints and appeals;
(6) monitor, analyze, and facilitate public comment on the development
and implementation of federal, State, and local laws, rules, and policies related
to housing;
(7) provide technical assistance to tenants intending to purchase
property under 9 V.S.A. § 4476;
(8) provide legal services to tenants facing eviction; and
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 21 of 31
(9) recommend legislative action as may be appropriate to resolve
problems encountered by tenants and landlords.
(c) On or before January 15 of each year, the Office of Tenant’s Rights
Advocate shall submit a report on the activities, performance, and fiscal
accounts of the Office during the preceding calendar year. The report shall be
submitted to the House Committee on General and Housing and the Senate
Committee on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs.
(d) The Office of Tenant’s Rights Advocate may:
(1) pursue administrative, judicial, and other remedies on behalf of any
individual tenant or group of tenants;
(2) adopt policies and procedures necessary to carry out the provisions
of this chapter; and
(3) take any other action necessary to fulfill the purposes of this section.
(e) All State agencies shall comply with reasonable requests from the
Office of Tenant’s Rights Advocate for information and assistance. The
Department of Housing and Community Development may adopt rules
necessary to ensure the cooperation of State agencies under this section.
(f) In the absence of written consent by a complainant or an individual
using the services of the Office or by a complainant’s or individual’s guardian
or legal representative or the absence of a court order, the Office of Tenant’s
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 22 of 31
Rights Advocate, its employees, and its contractors shall not disclose the
identity of the complainant or individual.
(g) The Office of Tenant’s Rights Advocate, its employees, and its
contractors shall take steps necessary to avoid any conflict of interest relating
to the performance of their responsibilities under this chapter. For the
purposes of this chapter, a conflict of interest exists whenever the Office, its
employees, or its contractors or a person affiliated with the Office, its
employees, or its contractors:
(1) has a direct or indirect interest in the information, referrals, or
assistance provided to individuals about obtaining or providing housing
services;
(2) has a direct ownership interest or investment interest in a place of
housing or housing provider;
(3) is employed by or participating in the management of a place of
housing or housing provider; or
(4) receives or has the right to receive, directly or indirectly, remuneration
under a compensation arrangement with a place of housing or housing
provider.
Sec. 5. 12 V.S.A. § 4857 is added to read:
§ 4857. RIGHT TO COUNSEL
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 23 of 31
(a) The defendant in an action brought under subchapter 3 of this chapter
shall have the right to representation by counsel throughout the proceeding.
Upon the filing of the complaint, the court shall notify the defendant that the
defendant has the right to counsel. If the defendant states that the defendant is
unable to pay for counsel, the court shall appoint counsel to be paid by the
State or set a hearing for a determination of the defendant’s ability to pay for
counsel.
(b) In appointing counsel under this section, the court may appoint counsel
from the Office of Tenant’s Rights Advocate established in 3 V.S.A. § 2480.
Sec. 6. 12 V.S.A. § 4858 is added to read:
§ 4858. EXPUNGEMENT
(a) A person may file a petition with the court requesting expungement of
an eviction proceeding under subchapter 3 of this chapter. The court shall
provide notice of the petition to the plaintiff landlord at the last known address
of the landlord.
(b) The court shall grant the petition without hearing if the petitioner and
the respondent stipulate to the granting of the petition. The respondent shall
file the stipulation with the court, and the court shall issue the petitioner an
order of expungement and provide notice of the order in accordance with this
section.
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 24 of 31
(c) The court shall grant the petition and order that the eviction history
record be expunged if the following conditions are met:
(1) at least five years have elapsed since the issuance of the judgement
under section 4854 of this title;
(2) a subsequent judgement for eviction has not been issued against the
individual arising out of a new incident or occurrence since the judgement
giving rise to the petition;
(3) the person has paid all rent, damages, costs, and reasonable
attorney’s fees awarded as part of an eviction proceeding; and
(4) the court finds that expungement of the eviction history record
serves the interests of justice.
(d) Upon entry of an order expunging files and records under this section,
the proceedings in the matter shall be considered never to have occurred; all
index references thereto shall be deleted; and the participant, the court, and law
enforcement officers and departments shall reply to any request for
information that no record exists with respect to such participant inquiry in any
matter. Copies of the order shall be sent to each agency, entity, or official
named therein.
Sec. 7. TENANT RIGHT TO PURCHASE DOWN PAYMENT
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 25 of 31
(a) The sum of $5,000,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Department of Housing and Community Development to grant to the Vermont
Housing and Conservation Board in fiscal year 2026 for the purpose of
establishing the Tenant Right to Purchase Down Payment Assistance Program.
(b)(1) The Agency shall use the funds appropriated in this section to
provide down payment assistance to tenants and nonprofit organizations
exercising their right to purchase a residential dwelling under 9 V.S.A. chapter
137, subchapter 5.
(2) The Agency shall adopt one or more legal mechanisms to ensure that
subsequent sales of a home that is subsidized through the Program are limited
to income-eligible homebuyers.
(c) The Agency may assign its rights under any investment or grant made
under this section to the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board or any
State agency or nonprofit organization qualifying under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3),
provided such assignee acknowledges and agrees to comply with the
provisions of this section.
(d) The Department shall report to the House Committee on General and
Housing and the Senate Committee on Economic Development, Housing and
General Affairs on the status of the Program annually, on or before January 15,
through 2030.
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 26 of 31
Sec. 8. 9 V.S.A. § 4501 is amended to read:
§ 4501. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(12)(A) “Harass” means to engage in unwelcome conduct that detracts
from, undermines, or interferes with a person’s:
(i) use of a place of public accommodation or any of the
accommodations, advantages, facilities, or privileges of a place of public
accommodation because of the person’s race, creed, color, national origin,
citizenship, immigration status, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, or disability; or
(ii) terms, conditions, privileges, or protections in the sale or rental
of a dwelling or other real estate, or in the provision of services or facilities in
connection with a dwelling or other real estate, because of the person’s race,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, marital status, religious creed,
color, national origin, citizenship, immigration status, or disability, or because
the person intends to occupy a dwelling with one or more minor children, or
because the person is a recipient of public assistance, or because the person is a
victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
* * *
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 27 of 31
Sec. 9. 9 V.S.A. § 4502 is amended to read:
§ 4502. PUBLIC ACCOMMODATIONS
(a) An owner or operator of a place of public accommodation or an agent
or employee of such owner or operator shall not, because of the race, creed,
color, national origin, citizenship, immigration status, marital status, sex,
sexual orientation, or gender identity of any person, refuse, withhold from, or
deny to that person any of the accommodations, advantages, facilities, and
privileges of the place of public accommodation.
* * *
Sec. 10. 9 V.S.A. § 4503 is amended to read:
§ 4503. UNFAIR HOUSING PRACTICES
(a) It shall be unlawful for any person:
(1) To refuse to sell or rent, or refuse to negotiate for the sale or rental
of, or otherwise make unavailable or deny, a dwelling or other real estate to
any person because of the race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age,
marital status, religious creed, color, national origin, citizenship, immigration
status, or disability of a person, or because a person intends to occupy a
dwelling with one or more minor children, or because a person is a recipient of
public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or
stalking.
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 28 of 31
(2) To discriminate against, or to harass, any person in the terms,
conditions, privileges, and protections of the sale or rental of a dwelling or
other real estate, or in the provision of services or facilities in connection with
a dwelling or other real estate, because of the race, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, age, marital status, religious creed, color, national origin,
citizenship, immigration status, or disability of a person, or because a person
intends to occupy a dwelling with one or more minor children, or because a
person is a recipient of public assistance, or because a person is a victim of
abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
(3) To make, print, or publish, or cause to be made, printed, or published
any notice, statement, or advertisement, with respect to the sale or rental of a
dwelling or other real estate that indicates any preference, limitation, or
discrimination based on race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age,
marital status, religious creed, color, national origin, citizenship, immigration
status, or disability of a person, or because a person intends to occupy a
dwelling with one or more minor children, or because a person is a recipient of
public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or
stalking.
(4) To represent to any person because of the race, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, age, marital status, religious creed, color, national
origin, citizenship, immigration status, or disability of a person, or because a
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 29 of 31
person intends to occupy a dwelling with one or more minor children, or
because a person is a recipient of public assistance, or because a person is a
victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking, that any dwelling or other real
estate is not available for inspection, sale, or rental when the dwelling or real
estate is in fact so available.
* * *
(6) To discriminate against any person in the making or purchasing of
loans or providing other financial assistance for real-estate-related transactions
or in the selling, brokering, or appraising of residential real property, because
of the race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, marital status,
religious creed, color, national origin, citizenship, immigration status, or
disability of a person, or because a person intends to occupy a dwelling with
one or more minor children, or because a person is a recipient of public
assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
(7) To engage in blockbusting practices, for profit, which may include
inducing or attempting to induce a person to sell or rent a dwelling by
representations regarding the entry into the neighborhood of a person or
persons of a particular race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age,
marital status, religious creed, color, national origin, citizenship, immigration
status, or disability of a person, or because a person intends to occupy a
dwelling with one or more minor children, or because a person is a recipient of
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 30 of 31
public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or
stalking.
(8) To deny any person access to or membership or participation in any
multiple listing service, real estate brokers’ organization, or other service,
organization, or facility relating to the business of selling or renting dwellings,
or to discriminate against any person in the terms or conditions of such access,
membership, or participation, on account of race, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, age, marital status, religious creed, color, national origin,
citizenship, immigration status, or disability of a person, or because a person is
a recipient of public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual
assault, or stalking.
* * *
(12) To discriminate in land use decisions or in the permitting of
housing because of race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, marital
status, religious creed, color, national origin, citizenship, immigration status,
disability, the presence of one or more minor children, income, or because of
the receipt of public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual
assault, or stalking, except as otherwise provided by law.
* * *
(d) The provisions of subsection (a) of this section with respect to
discrimination in the sales and rentals of dwellings on the basis of citizenship
VT LEG #380516 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.91
2025 Page 31 of 31
or immigration status shall not preclude the verification of immigration status
if required by federal law.
Sec. 11. APPROPRIATION
The sum of $4,000,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Department of Housing and Community Development in fiscal year 2026,
$2,000,000.00 of which shall be used to fund the Office of Tenant’s Rights
Advocate established in 3 V.S.A. § 2480 and $2,000,000.00 of which shall be
used for legal services through the Office of Tenant’s Rights Advocate.
Sec. 12. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380516 v.1